test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-hopwnj12_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hopõń: # Noun (12) hopõń 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hopõń+N+Sg+Nom: hopõń
     hopõń+N+Sg+Gen: hobõsõ
     hopõń+N+Sg+Par: hobõst
     hopõń+N+Sg+Ill: [hobõsõhe, hobõsõdõ]
     hopõń+N+Sg+Ine: [hobõsõn, hobõsõh, hobõsõhn]
     hopõń+N+Sg+Ela: hobõsõst
     hopõń+N+Sg+All: hobõsõlõ
     hopõń+N+Sg+Ade: hobõsõl
     hopõń+N+Sg+Abl: hobõsõlt
     hopõń+N+Sg+Tra: hobõsõs
     hopõń+N+Sg+Ter: hobõsõniq
     hopõń+N+Sg+Abe: hobõsõldaq
     hopõń+N+Sg+Com: hobõsõgaq
     hopõń+N+Pl+Nom: hobõsõq
     hopõń+N+Pl+Gen: [hobõsidõ, hobõsiidõ, hobõstõ]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Par: [hobõsit, hobõsiid]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Ill: [hobõsihe, hobõsiihe, hobõsidõ, hobõsiidõ, hobõstõhe, hobõstõdõ]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Ine: [hobõsin, hobõsiin, hobõsih, hobõsiih, hobõsihn, hobõsiihn, hobõstõn, hobõstõh, hobõstõhn]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Ela: [hobõsist, hobõsiist, hobõstõst]
     hopõń+N+Pl+All: [hobõsilõ, hobõsiilõ, hobõstõlõ]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Ade: [hobõsil, hobõsiil, hobõstõl]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Abl: [hobõsilt, hobõsiilt, hobõstõlt]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Tra: [hobõsis, hobõsiis, hobõstõs]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Ter: [hobõsiniq, hobõsiiniq, hobõstõniq]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Abe: [hobõsildaq, hobõsiildaq, hobõstõldaq]
     hopõń+N+Pl+Com: [hobõsidõgaq, hobõsiidõgaq, hobõstõgaq]
